Montana, session 2025, HB557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 20-1-304, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-1-304. Pupil-instruction-related day. (1) A pupil-instruction-related day is a day of:

(A) teacher activities, INCLUDING PREPARING FOR AND CONDUCTING PARENT CONFERENCES AND FOR
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 557

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0557.2
END-OF-TERM RECORDS DAYS; OR

(B) PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT THAT IS SOLELY devoted to improving the quality of instruction AND
ALIGNED TO STANDARDS OF THE BOARD OF PUBLIC EDUCATION. The activities may include but are not limited to
inservice training, attending state meetings of teacher organizations, and conducting parent conferences. The
activities may not include attending state meetings of teacher organizations.

(2) A maximum of 7 pupil-instruction-related days may be conducted during a school year, with a
minimum of 3 of the days for instructional and professional development meetings or other appropriate
inservice training, if the days are planned in accordance with the policy adopted by the board of public
education. The days may not be included as a part of the required minimum aggregate hours of pupil
instruction."

Section 2. Section 20-4-304, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-4-304. Attendance at instructional and professional development meetings. The trustees of
a school district shall close the schools of the district for the annual instructional and professional development
meetings of teachers' organizations. THE TRUSTEES OF A SCHOOL DISTRICT MAY CLOSE THE SCHOOLS OF THE
DISTRICT FOR THE ANNUAL INSTRUCTIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT MEETINGS OF TEACHERS'
ORGANIZATIONS MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF 20-1-304. A teacher may attend instructional and professional
development meetings without loss of salary or attend other appropriate inservice training that may be
prescribed by the trustees without loss of salary. If a teacher does not attend, the teacher may not be paid."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 557